en: Sandwich made with wholemeal loaf bread and ham and vegetables and cheese
fr: Sandwich pain de mie complet jambon crudités fromage

fr: Sandwichs au jambon de dinde
de: Putenschinkensandwiches
es: Sándwiches de jamón de pavo
fi: Kalkkunaleikkelesandwichit
it: Panini al prosciutto di tacchino
nl: Kalkoenhamsandwiches

en: Ham and cheese sandwiches
de: Sandwiches mit Schinken und Käse
es: Sándwiches de jamón y queso, Sándwiches mixtos, Bocadillos de jamón y queso, Bocatas de jamón y queso
fi: kinkku-juusto voileivät
fr: Sandwichs Jambon Fromage
hr: Sendviči sa šunkom i sirom
it: Panini prosciutto e formaggio, Sandwich prosciutto e formaggio, Tramezzini prosciutto e formaggio
nl: Ham-kaas sandwiches

en: Sandwich made with wholemeal loaf bread ham and cheese
fr: Sandwich triangle jambon fromage

en: Cheese sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи със сирене
de: Käse-Sandwiches
es: Sándwiches de queso, Bocadillos de queso, Bocatas de queso
fi: juustovoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au fromage
hr: Sendviči sa sirom
it: Panini al formaggio, Tramezzini al formaggio, Sandwich al formaggio
nl: Kaassandwiches
pt: Sanduíches de queijo
ro: Sandwich-uri cu brânză
ru: Сэндвичи с сыром
sv: Ostsmörgåsar

en: Goat cheese sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с козе сирене
de: Ziegenkäse-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de queso de cabra
fi: Vuohenjuustovoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au chèvre
hr: Sendviči s kozjim sirom
it: Panini al formaggio di capra
nl: Geitenkaassandwiches

en: Comté cheese sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи със сирене Комте
de: Comté-Käse-Sandwiches
es: Sándwiches de queso Comté
fi: Comté-voileivät
fr: Sandwichs au Comté
hr: Sendviči sa sirom comté
it: Panini al formaggio Comté
nl: Sandwiches met Comté kaas

en: Mozzarella sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с моцарела
de: Mozzarella-Sandwiches
es: Sándwiches de mozzarella
fi: Mozzarella-voileivät
fr: Sandwichs à la mozzarella
hr: Sendviči s mozzarellom
it: Panini alla mozzarella
nl: Sandwiches met Mozzarella

en: Emmental cheese sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с ементал
fi: voileivät
fr: Sandwichs à l'emmental
hr: Sendviči sa emental sirom
it: Panini al formaggio emmental
nl: Sandwiches met Emmental
pt: Sanduíches de queijo emmental

en: Cheddar sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с чедър
de: Cheddar-Käse-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de queso Cheddar
fi: Cheddar-juustovoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au cheddar
hr: Cheddar sendviči
it: Panini al formaggio Cheddar
nl: Sandwiches met Cheddar
pt: Sanduíches de queijo cheddar
ru: Сэндвичи с чеддером
sv: Cheddarostsmörgåsar

en: Tomme cheese sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи със сирене Том
de: Tomme-Käse-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de queso Tomme
fi: Tomme-juustovoileivät
fr: Sandwichs à la tomme
hr: Tomme sendviči sa sirom
it: Panini al formaggio Tomme
nl: Sandwiches met Tomme
pt: Sanduíches de queijo Tomme
ru: Сэндвичи с сыром Томм
sv: Tomme-ostsmörgåsar

en: Cantal cheese sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с кантал
de: Cantal-Käse-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de queso Cantal
fi: Cantal-juustovoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au cantal
hr: Sendviči sa kantalskim sirom
it: Panini al formaggio Cantal
nl: Sandwiches met Cantal
pt: Sanduíches de queijo Cantal
ru: Сэндвичи с кантальским сыром
sv: Cantal-ostsmörgåsar

fr: Sandwichs à la mimolette
bg: Сандвичи с мимолет
de: Mimolette-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de mimolette
fi: Mimolette-voileivät
it: Panini alla mimolette
nl: Sandwiches met Mimolette
pt: Sanduíches de mimolette
ru: Сэндвичи с мимолетт
sv: Mimolette-smörgåsar

en: Parmesan cheese sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с пармезан
fr: Sandwichs au parmesan
hr: Sendviči sa parmezanom
nl: Sandwiches met Parmezaan

en: Brie cheese sandwiches
de: Brie-Käse-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de queso Brie
fi: Brienjuustovoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au brie
hr: Sendviči sa brie sirom
it: Panini al formaggio Brie
nl: Sandwiches met Brie
pt: Sanduíches de queijo Brie
ru: Сэндвичи с сыром Бри
sv: Smörgåsar med Brieost

en: Sandwiches with camembert cheese
bg: Сандвичи с камамбер
de: Camembert-Käse-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de queso camembert
fi: Camembert-juustovoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au camembert
hr: Sendviči sa sirom camembert
it: Panini al formaggio camembert
nl: Sandwiches met camembert
pt: Sanduíches de queijo camembert
ru: Сэндвичи с камамбером
sv: Camembertostsmörgåsar

en: Baguette sandwiches with camembert cheese
fr: Sandwich baguette au camembert

en: Fish sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с риба
de: Fischsemmeln
es: Sándwiches de pescado, Bocadillos de pescado, Bocatas de pescado
fi: kalavoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au poisson
hr: Riblji sendviči
it: Panini al pesce, Tramezzini al pesce, Sandwich al pesce
nl: Vissandwiches
pt: Sanduíches de peixe
ru: Рыбные бутерброды
sv: Fisksmörgåsar
zh: 鱼肉三明治

en: Tuna sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с риба тон
de: Thunfisch-Sandwich, Thunfischsandwich
es: Sándwiches de atún, Bocadillos de atún, Bocatas de atún
fi: tonnikalavoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au thon
hr: Sendviči s tunom
it: Panini al tonno, Tramezzini al tonno, Sandwich al tonno
nl: Tonijnsandwiches
pt: Sanduíches de atum
zh: 吞拿鱼三明治

en: Sandwich with tuna and vegetables
bg: Сандвичи с риба тон и зеленчуци
de: Thunfisch-Sandwich mit Gemüse
es: Bocadillo de atún y verduras
fi: Tonnikala-vihannesvoileipä
fr: Sandwich crudités-thon, Sandwich thon-crudités
hr: Sendvič s tunom i povrćem
it: Panino con tonno e verdure
nl: Broodje met tonijn en groenten
pt: Sanduíche de atum e legumes
ru: Сэндвич с тунцом и овощами
sv: Macka med tonfisk och grönsaker